test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_A_NoExtra_mashkimod_gt-norm.yaml
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhimishinaanibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhimishinaanibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhimishinaanibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhimishiwaaibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhimishiwaaibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhimishiwaaibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mashkimodenhimishiniibanan
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mashkimodenhimishiniibanag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mashkimodenhimishiniibaning
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimashkimodensimishinaanibanan
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimashkimodensimishinaanibanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimashkimodensimishinaanibaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nimashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nimashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nimashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nimashkimodensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nimashkimodensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nimashkimodensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nimashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nimashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nimashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nimashkimodensimishiniibanan
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nimashkimodensimishiniibanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nimashkimodensimishiniibaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nimashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nimashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nimashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimashkimodenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimashkimodenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimashkimodenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nimashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nimashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nimashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nimashkimodenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nimashkimodenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nimashkimodenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nimashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nimashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nimashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nimashkimodenhimishiniibanan
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nimashkimodenhimishiniibanag
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nimashkimodenhimishiniibaning
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nimashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nimashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nimashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodensimishiniibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodensimishiniibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodensimishiniibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gimashkimodenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gimashkimodenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gimashkimodenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gimashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gimashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gimashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: omashkimodensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: omashkimodensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: omashkimodensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: omashkimodensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: omashkimodensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: omashkimodensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: omashkimodensimishiniibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: omashkimodensimishiniibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: omashkimodensimishiniibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: omashkimodenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: omashkimodenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: omashkimodenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: omashkimodenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: omashkimodenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: omashkimodenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: omashkimodenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: omashkimodenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: omashkimodenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: omashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: omashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: omashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
